California, session 20252026, AB2301.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 78045) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 3.2. Baccalaureate Degree in Nursing Pilot Program78045. (a) Notwithstanding Section 66010.4, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop a Baccalaureate Degree in Nursing Pilot Program that authorizes select community college districts to offer a Bachelor of Science in Nursing degree.(b) (1) The pilot program shall be limited to 10 community college districts statewide. The chancellor’s office shall identify and select eligible community college districts based on the following criteria:(A) The chancellor’s office is encouraged to ensure there is equitable access between the northern, central, and southern parts of the state to the pilot program.(B) Priority shall be given to community college districts located in underserved nursing areas.(C) Priority shall be given to community college districts where the service area of the community college district includes communities with persistent poverty.(D) The community college districts shall have a nationally accredited nursing program.(2) A community college district selected for the pilot program shall continue to offer an associate degree in nursing program.(3) The total number of associate degree in nursing and bachelor of science in nursing students at a community college district shall be limited to the community college district’s associate degree in nursing class size approved by the Board of Registered Nursing, and the total number of participants in a pilot program established pursuant to this article shall be limited to 25 percent of that class size, or 35 students, whichever is greater.(c) (1) Community college districts without a nationally accredited nursing program, but that are in “candidate” status, may be provisionally selected to participate in the pilot program, and may commence the program upon final accreditation. With regard to this paragraph, priority shall be given to community college districts located in the central valley and the Inland Empire. If a community college district that is provisionally selected is found to be making untimely progress toward accreditation, after notice and an opportunity to cure, the chancellor’s office may withdraw the provisional selection and may select a different community college district to participate in the pilot program.(2) The chancellor’s office shall develop a process designed to assist community college districts with nursing programs that are applying for national accreditation for the purpose of qualifying for the pilot program, and that assistance shall be made available to community college districts upon request.(d) Each participating community college district shall give priority registration for enrollment in the pilot program to students with an associate degree in nursing from that community college district.(e) (1) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall conduct an evaluation of the pilot program to determine the effectiveness of the program and the need to continue or expand the program. The evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) How many, and which specific, community college districts applied for the pilot program.(B) The number of pilot programs implemented, including information identifying the number of enrollments and degree recipients.(C) Which of the selected community college districts developed a pilot program in an underserved nursing area.(D) Which community college districts were selected to participate in the pilot program and why they were selected.(E) The pilot program costs and the funding sources that were used to finance each of the pilot programs.(F) The cost charged to students, including tuition and any additional fees.(G) The extent to which instruction was provided in person or online.(H) Current completion rates, if available, for each cohort of students participating in a pilot program.(I) Time-to-degree rates and completion rates for each pilot program.(J) The extent to which each pilot program established pursuant to this article is in compliance with the requirements of this article.(K) Other factors to consider when expanding bachelor of science in nursing opportunities across the state.(L) Recommendations on whether and how the authorization establishing the pilot program should be extended.(2) Each participating community college district shall submit the information necessary for the evaluation conducted pursuant to paragraph (1), as determined by the Legislative Analyst’s Office, to the chancellor’s office. The chancellor’s office shall provide the information received from the participating community college districts to the Legislative Analyst’s Office upon request.(3) The results of the evaluation shall be submitted to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2034.(f) Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) does not apply to a Bachelor of Science in Nursing offered pursuant to this article.(g) For purposes of this section, “underserved nursing area” means a registered nurse shortage area designated at a high-, medium-, or low-severity level as identified by the Department of Health Care Access and Information.(h)  This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2036, and as of that date is repealed.